Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202561-227
State flood mitigation plan; plan development group; engage federal, state, and local agencies and other sources.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall convene a plan development group which shall be housed and staffed for administrative purposes within such department. The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall engage with federal, state, and local agency and community stakeholders in the development of the state flood mitigation plan, including, but not limited to, the Department of Transportation, the Department of Economic Development, the Department of Agriculture, the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency, natural resources districts, the United States Department of Agriculture, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the United States Geological Survey, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the University of Nebraska, representatives of counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions, and the Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature. The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment may engage other sources to provide technical expertise as needed.

Laws 2020, LB632, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 344.